Wisconsin, session 2025, SB143.
do enact as follows:SB143,11Section 1. 8.18 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB143,2,628.18 (1) Candidates Except as provided under sub. (3), candidates for the 3senate and assembly nominated by each political party at the primary, the state 4officers, and the holdover state senators of each political party shall meet in the 5state capitol at 10 a.m. on the first Tuesday in October of each year in which there 6is a presidential election.SB143,27Section 2. 8.18 (3) of the statutes is created to read:SB143,2,1388.18 (3) If, in a presidential election year, a political party does not have a 9candidate for the senate or assembly nominated by the political party at the 10primary, state officer, or holdover state senator, in lieu of a convention under sub. 11(1), no later than 10 a.m. on the first Tuesday in October preceding the presidential 12election, the chairperson of the state committee of the political party shall do all of 13the following:SB143,2,1514(a) Nominate for the party one presidential elector from each congressional 15district and 2 electors from the state at large.SB143,2,1716(b) Immediately certify the names of the nominees under par. (a) to the 17chairperson of the commission.SB143,2,1818